Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 3 STATE AND LOCAL LICENSING
44-3-303. Transfer of ownership and temporary permits.

No license granted under the provisions of this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 shall be transferable except as provided in this subsection (1), but this shall not prevent a change of location as provided in section 44-3-301 (9).

When a license has been issued to a husband and wife, or to general or limited partners, the death of a spouse or partner shall not require the surviving spouse or partner to obtain a new license. All rights and privileges granted under the original license shall continue in full force and effect as to such survivors for the balance of the license period.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(c)(II) of this section, for any other transfer of ownership, application must be made to the state and local licensing authorities on forms prepared and furnished by the state licensing authority. In determining whether to permit a transfer of ownership, the licensing authorities shall consider only the requirements of section 44-3-307 and 1 CCR 203-2, rule 47-302, entitled "Changing, Altering, or Modifying Licensed Premises", or any analogous successor rule. The local licensing authority may conduct a hearing on the application for transfer of ownership after providing notice in accordance with subsection (1)(c)(III) of this section. Any transfer of ownership hearing by the state licensing authority must be held in accordance with section 44-3-305 (2).

A license merger and conversion as provided for in section 44-3-410 (1)(b) includes a transfer of ownership of at least two retail liquor stores, a change of location of one of the retail liquor stores, and a merger and conversion of the retail liquor store licenses into a single liquor-licensed drugstore license, all as part of a single transaction, and the liquor-licensed drugstore applicant need not apply separately for a transfer of ownership under this section. The liquor-licensed drugstore applying for a license merger and conversion pursuant to section 44-3-410 (1)(b) is ineligible for a temporary permit pursuant to this section. The local licensing authority shall consider the reasonable requirements of the neighborhood pursuant to section 44-3-312 when making a determination on the merger and conversion of the retail liquor store licenses into a single liquor-licensed drugstore license. The local licensing authority may hold a hearing on the application for the license merger and conversion after providing notice in accordance with subsection (1)(c)(III) of this section.

Prior to holding a hearing as provided in this subsection (1)(c), the local licensing authority shall notify the applicant of the hearing at least ten days before the hearing and shall post, or may direct the license applicant to post, a notice of the hearing in a conspicuous location on the licensed premises for at least ten consecutive days before the hearing.

The state or a local licensing authority shall not approve a transfer of ownership under this subsection (1) until the applicant files with the local licensing authority confirmation from each wholesaler licensed under this article 3 that has sold alcohol beverages to the transferor that the wholesaler has been paid in full for all alcohol beverages delivered to the transferor.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 3 to the contrary, a local licensing authority may issue a temporary permit to a transferee of any retail class of alcohol beverage license issued by the local licensing authority pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that a local licensing authority shall not issue a temporary permit to a liquor-licensed drugstore that has acquired ownership of licensed retail liquor stores in accordance with section 44-3-410 (1)(b). A temporary permit authorizes a transferee to continue selling alcohol beverages as permitted under the permanent license during the period in which an application to transfer the ownership of the license is pending.

A temporary permit shall authorize a transferee to conduct business and sell alcohol beverages at retail in accordance with the license of the transferor subject to compliance with all of the following conditions:

The premises where alcohol beverages are sold shall have been previously licensed by the state and local licensing authorities, and the license shall have been valid at the time the application for transfer of ownership was filed with the local licensing authority that has jurisdiction to approve an application for a temporary permit.

The applicant has filed with the local licensing authority on forms provided by the department an application for the transfer of the liquor license. The application shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

The name and address of the applicant; if the applicant is a partnership, the names and addresses of all the partners; and, if the applicant is a corporation, association, or other organization, the names and addresses of the president, vice-president, secretary, and managing officer;

The applicant's financial interest in the proposed transfer;

The premises for which the temporary permit is sought;

Such other information as the local licensing authority may require; and

A statement that all accounts for alcohol beverages sold to the applicant are paid.

The application for a temporary permit shall be filed no later than thirty days after the filing of the application for transfer of ownership and shall be accompanied by a temporary permit fee not to exceed one hundred dollars.

When applying with the local licensing authority for a temporary permit, the applicant shall provide a copy, by facsimile or otherwise, of the statement made pursuant to subsection (3)(b)(V) of this section to the state licensing authority. The statement is a public record and shall be open to inspection by the public.

A temporary permit, if granted, by a local licensing authority shall be issued within five working days after the receipt of the application. A temporary permit issued pursuant to this section shall be valid until such time as the application to transfer ownership of the license to the applicant is granted or denied or for one hundred twenty days, whichever occurs first; except that, if the application to transfer the license has not been granted or denied within the one-hundred-twenty-day period and the transferee demonstrates good cause, the local licensing authority may extend, in its discretion, the validity of the permit for an additional period not to exceed sixty days.

A temporary permit shall also be authorized in the event of a transfer of possession of the licensed premises by operation of law, a petition in bankruptcy pursuant to federal bankruptcy law, the appointment of a receiver, a foreclosure action by a secured party, or a court order dispossessing the prior licensee of all rights of possession pursuant to article 40 of title 13.

A temporary permit may be canceled, revoked, or summarily suspended if the local or state licensing authority determines that there is probable cause to believe that the transferee has violated any provision of this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 or has violated any rule adopted by the local or state licensing authority or has failed to truthfully disclose those matters required pursuant to the application forms required by the department.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 974, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(3)(b) and (6) amended, (SB 19-241), ch. 390, p. 3478, § 61, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-303 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-304. State licensing authority - application and issuance procedures - definitions - rules.

Applications for licenses under the provisions of this article 3 and articles 4 and 5 of this title 44 shall be made to the state licensing authority on forms prepared and furnished by the state licensing authority and shall set forth such information as the state licensing authority may require to enable the authority to determine whether a license should be granted. The information shall include the name and address of the applicant, and if a partnership, also the names and addresses of all the partners, and if a corporation, association, or other organization, also the names and addresses of the president, vice-president, secretary, and managing officer, together with all other information deemed necessary by the licensing authority. Each application shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of the person or persons as the state licensing authority may prescribe.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section, an applicant seeking licenses for multiple locations may request the state licensing authority to establish a master file. All requests for a master file shall be made on forms provided by the state licensing authority and shall contain such information as the state licensing authority may require to enable the authority to determine the suitability of the license applicant and its principal owners as required pursuant to section 44-3-307. The state licensing authority shall either approve the request for a master file and issue an approval letter, or deny the request pursuant to the provisions of section 44-3-305. Any change to information contained in the master file shall be reported by the applicant or licensee to the state licensing authority within thirty days after the change. Failure to report all changes as required may be grounds for suspension or revocation of a license or licenses as determined by the state licensing authority. No local licensing authority shall require applicants with an approved master file to file additional background investigation forms or fingerprints. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a local licensing authority from conducting its own investigation, or from verifying any of the information provided by the applicant, or from denying the application of the applicant pursuant to the provisions set forth in section 44-3-307.

As used in this part 3, "master file" means a file that is established by the state licensing authority and that contains licensing and background information for an applicant seeking licenses pursuant to this article 3 in multiple locations. The master file shall be available to the local licensing authority.

The state licensing authority shall promulgate rules governing the minimum number of multiple locations required to establish and maintain a master file.

Before granting any license for which application has been made, the state licensing authority or one or more of its inspectors may visit and inspect the plant or property in which the applicant proposes to conduct business and investigate the fitness to conduct such business of any person or the officers and directors of any corporation applying for a license. In investigating the fitness of the applicant or a licensee, the state licensing authority may have access to criminal history record information furnished by a criminal justice agency, subject to any restrictions imposed by such agency. In the event the state licensing authority takes into consideration information concerning the applicant's criminal history record, the state licensing authority shall also consider any information provided by the applicant regarding such criminal history record, including but not limited to evidence of rehabilitation, character references, and educational achievements, especially those items pertaining to the period of time between the applicant's last criminal conviction and the consideration of the application for a license.

As used in subsection (2)(a) of this section, "criminal justice agency" means any federal, state, or municipal court or any governmental agency or subunit of such agency that performs the administration of criminal justice pursuant to a statute or executive order and that allocates a substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice.

The state licensing authority shall not issue a license pursuant to this section until the local licensing authority has approved the application provided for in section 44-3-309.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 976, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-304 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-305. Denial of application.

The state licensing authority shall refuse a state license if the premises on which the applicant proposes to conduct its business do not meet the requirements of this article 3, or if the character of the applicant or its officers or directors is such that violations of this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44 would be likely to result if a license were granted, or if in its opinion licenses already granted for the particular locality are adequate for the reasonable needs of the community.

The state licensing authority shall not refuse a state license after a local license has been granted, except upon hearing after fifteen days' notice to the applicant and to the local licensing authority. The notice shall be in writing and shall state grounds upon which the application may be refused. If the applicant does not respond to the notice within fifteen days after the date of the notice, the application for a license shall be denied. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-105, and judicial review of the state licensing authority's decision shall be pursuant to section 24-4-106.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 978, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-305 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-306. Inactive licenses.

The state or local licensing authority, in its discretion, may revoke or elect not to renew a retail license if it determines that the licensed premises has been inactive, without good cause, for at least one year or, in the case of a retail license approved for a facility that has not been constructed, the facility has not been constructed and placed in operation within two years after approval of the license application or construction of the facility has not commenced within one year after the approval.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 978, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-306 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-307. Persons prohibited as licensees - definition.

No license provided by this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44 shall be issued to or held by:

Any person until the annual fee therefor has been paid;

Any person who is not of good moral character;

Any corporation, any of whose officers, directors, or stockholders holding ten percent or more of the outstanding and issued capital stock thereof are not of good moral character;

Any partnership, association, or company, any of whose officers, or any of whose members holding ten percent or more interest therein, are not of good moral character;

Any person employing, assisted by, or financed in whole or in part by any other person who is not of good character and reputation satisfactory to the respective licensing authorities;

Any person unless the person's character, record, and reputation are satisfactory to the respective licensing authority;

Any natural person under twenty-one years of age.

In making a determination as to character or when considering the conviction of a crime, a licensing authority shall be governed by the provisions of section 24-5-101.

With respect to arts or club license applications, an investigation of the character of the president or chair of the board and the operational manager shall be deemed sufficient to determine whether to issue the arts or club license to the applicant.

No license provided by this article 3 shall be issued to or held by a peace officer described in section 16-2.5-121, 16-2.5-122, 16-2.5-123, 16-2.5-125, 16-2.5-126, 16-2.5-128, or 16-2.5-129, or the state licensing authority or any of its inspectors or employees.

A peace officer described in section 16-2.5-103, 16-2.5-105, 16-2.5-108, 16-2.5-132, or 16-2.5-149 may not obtain or hold a license under this article 3 to operate a licensed premises that is located within the same jurisdiction that employs the peace officer.

In investigating the qualifications of the applicant or a licensee, the local licensing authority may have access to criminal history record information furnished by a criminal justice agency, subject to any restrictions imposed by such agency. In the event the local licensing authority takes into consideration information concerning the applicant's criminal history record, the local licensing authority shall also consider any information provided by the applicant regarding such criminal history record, including but not limited to evidence of rehabilitation, character references, and educational achievements, especially those items pertaining to the period of time between the applicant's last criminal conviction and the consideration of the application for a license.

As used in subsection (3)(a) of this section, "criminal justice agency" means any federal, state, or municipal court or any governmental agency or subunit of such agency that performs the administration of criminal justice pursuant to a statute or executive order and that allocates a substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice.

At the time of the application for a license, the applicant shall submit fingerprints and file personal history information concerning the applicant's qualifications for a license on forms prepared by the state licensing authority. The state and local licensing authorities shall submit the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall forward the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting fingerprint-based criminal history record checks. When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an applicant performed pursuant to this section reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the licensing authority shall require the applicant to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). The licensing authorities shall use the information resulting from the fingerprint-based criminal history record check and, if applicable, name-based judicial record check to investigate and to determine if an applicant is qualified for a license pursuant to this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44. The licensing authority may verify any of the information required to be submitted by an applicant pursuant to this section. An applicant shall not be required to submit additional information beyond that required in this subsection (3) unless the licensing authority has determined any of the following:

The applicant has misrepresented a material fact;

The applicant has an established criminal history record;

A prior criminal or administrative proceeding determined that the applicant violated alcohol beverage laws;

The information submitted by an applicant is incomplete; or

The character, record, or reputation of the applicant, his or her agent, or his or her principal is such that a potential violation of this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 may occur if a license is issued to the applicant.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 978, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(3)(c) amended, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 559, § 52, effective April 18.

L. 2022:

IP(3)(c) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 534, § 56, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-307 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-308. Unlawful financial assistance.

It is unlawful for any person licensed pursuant to this article 3 as a manufacturer, limited winery, wholesaler, or importer, or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with any of said licensees, to furnish, supply, or loan, in any manner, directly or indirectly, to any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44:
(1) (a) (I) It is unlawful for any person licensed pursuant to this article 3 as a manufacturer, limited winery, wholesaler, or importer, or any person, partnership, association, organization, or corporation interested financially in or with any of said licensees, to furnish, supply, or loan, in any manner, directly or indirectly, to any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44:

Any financial assistance, including the extension of credit for more than thirty days, as specified in section 44-3-202 (2)(b) or in rules of the state licensing authority; or

Any equipment, fixtures, chattels, or furnishings used in the storing, handling, serving, or dispensing of food or alcohol beverages within the premises or for making any structural alterations or improvements in or on the building in which the premises is located.

This subsection (1) does not:

Apply to signs or displays within the licensed premises; or

Prevent a representative, employee, or agent of a person licensed under this article 3 as a manufacturer, limited winery, wholesaler, or importer from pouring or serving the licensee's alcohol beverage products as part of a tasting being conducted on the licensed premises of a person licensed under this article 3 to sell alcohol beverages at retail for off-premises consumption, and pouring or serving the licensee's alcohol beverages does not constitute labor provided by a person licensed under this article 3 as a manufacturer, limited winery, wholesaler, or importer to a person licensed under this article 3 to sell alcohol beverages at retail.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1)(a) of this section, any person or party described in subsection (1)(a) of this section may provide financial or in-kind assistance, directly or indirectly, to a nonprofit arts organization that has been issued an arts license pursuant to section 44-3-419 or to a state-supported institution of higher education in Colorado, including local district colleges, area technical colleges, and the Auraria higher education center, or the governing board of a state-supported institution of higher education, or to a nonpublic institution of higher education as defined in section 23-3.7-102 that is operating pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, if the institution has been issued a license pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44.

The state licensing authority, by rule, shall require a complete disclosure of all persons having a direct or indirect financial interest, and the extent of such interest, in each hotel and restaurant license and each retail gaming tavern license issued under this article 3. A willful failure to report and disclose the financial interests of all persons having a direct or indirect financial interest in a hotel and restaurant license or in a retail gaming tavern license shall be grounds for suspension or revocation of such license by the state licensing authority. The invalidity of any provision of this subsection (2) concerning interest in more than one hotel and restaurant license or retail gaming tavern license shall invalidate all interests in more than one hotel and restaurant license or retail gaming tavern license, and such invalidity shall make any such interest unlawful financial assistance.

It is unlawful for any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 to receive and obtain from the persons or parties described and referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section, directly or indirectly, any financial assistance or any equipment, fixtures, chattels, or furnishings used in the storing, handling, serving, or dispensing of food or alcohol beverages within the premises or from making any structural alterations or improvements in or on the building on which the premises is located.
(3) (a) (I) It is unlawful for any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 to receive and obtain from the persons or parties described and referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section, directly or indirectly, any financial assistance or any equipment, fixtures, chattels, or furnishings used in the storing, handling, serving, or dispensing of food or alcohol beverages within the premises or from making any structural alterations or improvements in or on the building on which the premises is located.

This subsection (3) does not:

Apply to signs or displays within the premises or to advertising materials that are intended primarily to advertise the product of the wholesaler or manufacturer and that have only negligible value in themselves or to the inspection and servicing of malt or vinous liquor-dispensing equipment to the extent necessary for the maintenance of reasonable standards of purity, cleanliness, and health; or

Prevent a representative, employee, or agent of a licensee described and referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section from pouring or serving the licensee's alcohol beverage products as part of a tasting being conducted on the licensed premises of the person licensed under this article 3 to sell alcohol beverages at retail for off-premises consumption, and pouring or serving the licensee's alcohol beverages does not constitute labor provided by a licensee described in subsection (1)(a) of this section to a person licensed under this article 3 to sell alcohol beverages at retail.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (3)(a) of this section, a nonprofit arts organization that has been issued an arts license pursuant to section 44-3-419 or a state-supported institution of higher education in Colorado, including local district colleges, area technical colleges, and the Auraria higher education center, or the governing board of a state-supported institution of higher education, or a nonpublic institution of higher education as defined in section 23-3.7-102 that is operating pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 501 (c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, if the institution has been issued a license pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44, may receive financial or in-kind assistance, directly or indirectly, from the persons or parties described and referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section.

Except as otherwise authorized, it is unlawful for any person or corporation holding any license pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 or any person who is a stockholder, director, or officer of any corporation holding a license pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 to be a stockholder, director, or officer or to be interested, directly or indirectly, in any person or corporation that lends money to any person or corporation licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44, but this subsection (4) does not apply to banks or savings and loan associations supervised and regulated by an agency of the state or federal government, or to FHA-approved mortgagees, or to stockholders, directors, or officers thereof; and it is unlawful for any person or corporation licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44, or any stockholder, director, or officer of such corporation, to make any loan or be interested, directly or indirectly, in any loan to any other person licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that this subsection (4)(a) does not apply to any financial institution that comes into possession of a licensed premises by virtue of a foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure if the financial institution does not retain such premises for longer than one year or for such time exceeding one year as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section.

In the case of a financial institution that comes into possession of a licensed premises by virtue of a foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure, the state and the local licensing authority may grant a transfer of ownership for such license for a period of one year and, upon notice and hearing, renewal of such license may be granted. This subsection (4)(b) shall apply in the case of every foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure in which disposition of the license has not otherwise been made by the state or local licensing authority.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, stockholder, or person interested, directly or indirectly, in any retail business or establishment of a person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44 to enter into any agreement with any person or party or to receive, possess, or accept any money, fixtures, supplies, or things of value from any person or party, whereby a person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44 may be influenced or caused, directly or indirectly, to buy, sell, dispense, or handle the product of any manufacturer of alcohol beverages.

This subsection (5) does not:

Apply to displays within the premises; or

Prevent a representative, employee, or agent of a person licensed under this article 3 as a manufacturer, limited winery, wholesaler, or importer from pouring or serving the licensee's alcohol beverage products as part of a tasting being conducted on the licensed premises of a person licensed under this article 3 to sell alcohol beverages at retail for off-premises consumption, and pouring or serving the licensee's alcohol beverages does not constitute labor provided by a person licensed under this article 3 as a manufacturer, limited winery, wholesaler, or importer to a person licensed under this article 3 to sell alcohol beverages at retail.

Any transaction, agreement, or arrangement prohibited by the provisions of this section, if made and entered into by and between the persons and parties described and referred to in this section, is unlawful, illegal, invalid, and void, and any obligation or liability arising out of such transaction, agreement, or arrangement shall be unenforceable in any court of this state by or against any such persons and parties entering into the transaction, agreement, or arrangement.

This section is intended to prohibit and prevent the control of the outlets for the sale of alcohol beverages by any persons or parties other than the persons licensed pursuant to the provisions of this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44.

It is unlawful for an owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a brew pub, distillery pub, or vintner's restaurant license to conduct, own in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in a wholesaler's license issued under this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

Source:

L. 2018:

(1)(a), (3)(a), and (5) amended, (SB 18-243), ch. 366, p. 2198, § 6, effective June 4; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 980, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II)(B), and (5)(b)(II) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 6, § 7, effective January 31.

44-3-309. Local licensing authority - applications - optional premises licenses.

A local licensing authority may issue only the following alcohol beverage licenses upon payment of the fee specified in section 44-3-505:

Retail liquor store license;

Liquor-licensed drugstore license;

Beer and wine license;

Hotel and restaurant license;

Tavern license;

Brew pub license;

Club license;

Arts license;

Racetrack license;

Optional premises license;

Retail gaming tavern license;

Vintner's restaurant license;

Distillery pub license;

Lodging and entertainment license.

An application for any license specified in subsection (1) of this section or section 44-4-107 shall be filed with the appropriate local licensing authority on forms provided by the state licensing authority and containing such information as the state licensing authority may require. Each application shall be verified by the oath or affirmation of such persons as prescribed by the state licensing authority.

The applicant shall file at the time of application plans and specifications for the interior of the building if the building to be occupied is in existence at the time. If the building is not in existence, the applicant shall file a plot plan and a detailed sketch for the interior and submit an architect's drawing of the building to be constructed. In its discretion, the local licensing authority may impose additional requirements necessary for the approval of the application.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 983, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-309 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-310. Optional premises license - local option.

No optional premises license, or optional premises permit for a hotel and restaurant license, as defined in section 44-3-103 (33)(a), shall be issued within any municipality or the unincorporated portion of any county unless the governing body of the municipality has adopted by ordinance, or the governing body of the county has adopted by resolution, specific standards for the issuance of optional premises licenses or for optional premises for a hotel and restaurant license. No municipality or county shall be required to adopt such standards or make such licenses available within its jurisdiction.

In addition to all other standards applicable to the issuance of licenses under this article 3, the governing body may adopt additional standards for the issuance of optional premises licenses or for optional premises for a hotel and restaurant license that may include:

The specific types of outdoor sports and recreational facilities that are eligible to apply for an optional premises license or an optional premises for a hotel and restaurant license;

Restrictions on the number of optional premises that any one licensee may have on an outdoor sports or recreational facility;

A restriction on the minimum size of any applicant's outdoor sports or recreational facility that would be eligible for the issuance of an optional premises license or optional premises for a hotel and restaurant license;

Any other requirements necessary to ensure the control of the premises and the ease of enforcement.

An applicant for a hotel and restaurant license who desires to sell or serve alcohol beverages on optional premises shall file with the optional premises permit application a list of the optional premises locations. The application and list shall be filed with the state and local licensing authorities upon initial application, and each license year thereafter. Approval of the areas must be obtained from the state licensing authority and the local licensing authority. The decision of each authority shall be discretionary. In the event that the state and local licensing authorities allow the area or areas to be designated optional premises, no alcohol beverages may be served on the optional premises without the licensee having provided written notice to the state and local licensing authorities forty-eight hours prior to serving alcohol beverages on the optional premises. The notice shall contain the specific days and hours on which the optional premises are to be used. This subsection (3) shall not be construed to permit the violation of any other provision of this article 3 under circumstances not specified in this subsection (3).

An applicant for an optional premises license who desires to sell, dispense, or serve alcohol beverages on optional premises shall file with the optional premises license application a list of the optional premises locations and the area in which the applicant desires to store alcohol beverages for future use on the optional premises. The applicant shall file the application and additional information with the state and local licensing authorities upon initial application and each license year thereafter. Approval of the license and areas must be obtained from the state licensing authority and the local licensing authority. The decision of each authority shall be discretionary. In the event that the state and local licensing authorities allow the area or areas to be designated optional premises, no alcohol beverages may be served on the optional premises without the licensee having provided written notice to the state and local licensing authorities forty-eight hours prior to serving alcohol beverages on the optional premises. The notice must contain the specific days and hours on which the optional premises are to be used. This subsection (4) does not permit the violation of any other provision of this article 3 under circumstances not specified in this subsection (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 983, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-310 as it existed prior to 2018.